src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The ALBANIAN language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V_LAHEM
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>%^Pen%^A2Em   #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>sh   #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t    #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>m  #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ni  #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>n  #   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Inf:%>m    #   ;
!#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
