src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in UNDEFINED language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
lahem:lahe V_LAHEM "bathe, wash oneself" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
